Illinois, session 104th, SB3591.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Statewide Hate Crime Information Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:7    "Director" means the Director of the Illinois State 8Police.9    "Hate crime" means any crime defined in subsection (a) of 10Section 12-7.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 11    Section 10. Duties of the Illinois State Police.12    (a) The Illinois State Police shall compile and maintain 13information about hate crimes in order to gather information 14regarding the various modus operandi used to victimize 15individuals or groups by reason of actual or perceived race, 16color, creed, religion, ancestry, gender, sexual orientation, 17or physical or mental disability, organizations that tend to 18routinely target individuals or groups by reason of actual or 19perceived race, color, creed, religion, ancestry, gender, 20sexual orientation, or physical or mental disability, and 21geographic areas where hate crimes tend to occur.22    (b) The Illinois State Police shall adopt a uniform   SB3591- 2 -LRB104 17658 RLC 31089 b1reporting format for the entry of pertinent intelligence 2information regarding the report of a person arrested for a 3hate crime to the Illinois State Police Statewide Terrorism 4and Intelligence Center. The report shall include, at a 5minimum:6        (1) the date, time, and specific location of the 7    incident;8        (2) the protected characteristic targeted (bias 9    motivation);10        (3) a narrative description of the incident;11        (4) the identity of the suspect and victim (subject to 12    confidentiality laws);13        (5) any organized group involved or affirmatively 14    supporting the incident; and15        (6) any additional information deemed necessary for 16    further investigative purposes.17    (c) The Illinois State Police shall cooperate with all law 18enforcement agencies wishing to gain access to the Illinois 19State Police Statewide Terrorism and Intelligence Center and 20facilitate their entry into the system.21    (d) The Illinois State Police shall use the information to 22develop and recommend techniques to be used by law enforcement 23agencies and prosecutors in the investigation, apprehension, 24and prosecution of hate crime offenders. 25    Section 15. Duties of local law enforcement agencies. Each   SB3591- 3 -LRB104 17658 RLC 31089 b1law enforcement agency shall: 2        (1) submit a report to the Illinois State Police 3    through the Central Repository after any arrest with 4    probable cause demonstrating the commission of a hate 5    crime;6        (2) submit reports of persons arrested for hate crimes 7    as soon as the minimum level of data or information 8    specified by the Illinois State Police is available; and9        (3) notify the applicable prosecutor of any other 10    information in the accused person's history of 11    perpetrating hate crimes. 12    Section 90. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 13amended by changing Section 115-7.4 as follows: 14    (725 ILCS 5/115-7.4)15    Sec. 115-7.4. Evidence in domestic violence, murder, and 16hate crime cases.17    (a) In a criminal prosecution in which the defendant is 18accused of an offense of domestic violence as defined in 19paragraphs (1) and (3) of Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic 20Violence Act of 1986, or first degree murder or second degree 21murder when the commission of the offense involves domestic 22violence, or a hate crime as defined in subsection (a) of 23Section 12-7.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012, evidence of the 24defendant's commission of another offense or offenses of   SB3591- 4 -LRB104 17658 RLC 31089 b1domestic violence or hate crimes is admissible, and may be 2considered for its bearing on any matter to which it is 3relevant.4    (b) In weighing the probative value of the evidence 5against undue prejudice to the defendant, the court may 6consider:7        (1) the proximity in time to the charged or predicate 8    offense;9        (2) the degree of factual similarity to the charged or 10    predicate offense; or11        (3) other relevant facts and circumstances.12    (c) In a criminal case in which the prosecution intends to 13offer evidence under this Section, it must disclose the 14evidence, including statements of witnesses or a summary of 15the substance of any testimony, at a reasonable time in 16advance of trial, or during trial if the court excuses 17pretrial notice on good cause shown.18    (d) In a criminal case in which evidence is offered under 19this Section, proof may be made by specific instances of 20conduct, testimony as to reputation, or testimony in the form 21of an expert opinion, except that the prosecution may offer 22reputation testimony only after the opposing party has offered 23that testimony. 24(Source: P.A. 97-1036, eff. 8-20-12.)